Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.180

Allotment of appropriations for school plant facilities—Reduction of appropriation for receipt of federal funds.

The total amount of funds appropriated under the provisions of RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 shall be reduced by the amount of federal funds made available during each biennium for school construction purposes under any applicable federal law. The funds appropriated by RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 and available for allotment by the superintendent of public instruction shall be reduced by the amount of such federal funds made available. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the total amount of funds appropriated by RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180 shall not be reduced by reason of any grants to any school district of federal moneys paid under Public Law No. 815 or any other federal act authorizing school building construction assistance to federally affected areas.

[ 2006 c 263 s 318; 1990 c 33 s 463; 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.47.810, 28.47.810.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 244: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.